Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2316
Retirement system; retirement value for employee.

The retirement value for any employee who retires under the provisions of section 23-2315 shall be (1) for participants in the defined contribution benefit, the sum of the employee's employee account and employer account as of the date of final account value and (2) for participants in the cash balance benefit, the benefit provided in section 23-2308.01 as of the date of final account value.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 16, p. 407;

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 7.